Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB221.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 39A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Division of Emergency Management, in cooperation with the Department of
Kentucky State Police, the Transportation Cabinet, the Kentucky Broadcasters
Association, and the Kentucky Press Association, shall operate a system to notify
the public when severe weather presents an imminent threat to the safety of the
public. The system shall be known as the Kentucky Severe Weather Alert System.
(2) The system shall utilize existing resources, including but not limited to electronic
highway signs, the emergency broadcast system, law enforcement
communications systems, and local, regional, and statewide media providers.
(3) The division shall only issue a public alert using the Kentucky Severe Weather
Alert System when, in consultation with the law enforcement agency in the
jurisdiction in which the severe weather is forecasted to occur, it has determined:
(a) That the severe weather presents an imminent threat to the safety of
humans, animals, or infrastructure in the affected area;
(b) That public notification is the most appropriate method of notifying the
public of the severe weather threat;
(c) The geographic area in which the notification shall be made; and
(d) That a severe weather alert has not already been made by the National
Weather Service or any other federal alerting authority for that geographic
area for the same severe weather threat.
(4) To initiate the public notification using the Kentucky Severe Weather Alert
System, the division shall alert the public and private agencies and organizations
making the notification and shall provide those agencies and organizations with
the information that the division deems necessary.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 263
(5) All law enforcement agencies in the Commonwealth shall cooperate with the
division in the provision and dissemination of information regarding any severe
weather.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 11/24/2025 9:36 AM Jacketed